Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201581-3446
Construction projects on private lands; applicability of act; owner; duties.

(1) A project on private land is subject to the provisions of the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act unless exempt under section 81-3449 or 81-3453.

(2) The owner of any real property who allows a project to be constructed on his or her real property is engaged in the practice of architecture or engineering unless he or she employs or causes others to employ licensed architects or professional engineers or persons under the direct supervision of licensed architects or professional engineers to furnish at least minimum construction phase services with respect to the project or is exempt from the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act under sections 81-3449 and 81-3453.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) Construction phase service includes at least the following services: (i) Visiting the project site on a regular basis as is necessary to determine that the work is proceeding generally in accordance with the technical submissions submitted to the building official at the time the project permit was issued; and (ii) processing technical submissions required of the contractor by the terms of contract documents. The term does not include supervision of construction, review of payment applications, resolution of disputes between the owner and contractor, and other such items which are considered additional construction administration services which the owner may or may not elect to include in the architect's or engineer's scope of work; and

(b) Owner means with respect to any real property the following persons: (i) The record owner of such real property; (ii) the lessee of all or any portion of the real property when the lease covers all of that portion of the real property upon which the project is being constructed, the lessee has significant approval rights with respect to the project, and the lease, at the time the project begins, has a remaining term of not less than ten years; or (iii) the grantee of an easement granting right-of-way to construct the project.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 46;

Laws 2011, LB45, § 12;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 43.